California, session 20252026, SB1432.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 83109 of the Government Code is amended to read:83109. For purposes of Section 19818.6, the Commission may include a nonclerical position in a class in the civil service classification plan that is separate and distinct from any position of any other department or agency.SEC. 2. Section 85200 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 57 of Chapter 278 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:85200. (a) Before becoming a candidate for a specific office, an individual shall file a statement of intention to be a candidate, signed under penalty of perjury.(1) An individual who intends to be a candidate for elective state office, or for any other office listed in subdivision (a) of Section 84215, shall file the statement of intention online or electronically with the Secretary of State.(2) An individual who intends to be a candidate for any other elective office shall file the statement of intention with the same filing officer and in the same location as the individual would file an original campaign report pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 84215.(b) Candidates and officeholders who do not intend to qualify as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall indicate this status on the statement of intention.(1) Each candidate or officeholder who has indicated their intention to not qualify as a committee pursuant to this subdivision, but thereafter qualifies as a committee by receiving contributions or making expenditures totaling two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more in a calendar year, shall amend their statement of intention with the Secretary of State or their local filing officer within 48 hours of qualifying and register as a committee pursuant to Section 84101.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, in calculating whether two thousand dollars ($2,000) in expenditures have been made, payments for a filing fee or for a statement of qualification shall not be included if the payments are made from the candidate’s personal funds.(c) For purposes of this section, “contribution” does not include any payments from the candidate’s personal funds for a candidate filing fee or a candidate statement of qualifications fee.SEC. 3. Section 86112.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:86112.3. (a) Each person filing a report pursuant to this article who sends any written or printed invitation to an elected state officer, candidate for elective state office, legislative official official, or agency official, shall include on the invitation or on a letter attached to the invitation the following typed, printed, or handwritten statement that is at least as large and readable as 10-point Roman boldface type, in a color or print that contrasts with the background so as to be easily legible:Attendance at this event by a public official will constitute acceptance of a reportable gift.(b) The notice specified in subdivision (a) shall not be required to appear on any invitation wherein attendance at the event described in the invitation will not constitute acceptance of a reportable gift by an elected state officer, candidate for elective state office, legislative official official, or agency official, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 87207.(c) The remedies provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 83100) constitute the exclusive penalty for a violation of this section. The remedies provided in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 91000) do not apply to this section.SEC. 4.Section 86116 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 873 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:86116.Every person described in Section 86115 shall file periodic reports containing the following information:(a)The name, business address, email address, and telephone number of the lobbyist employer or other person filing the report.(b)The total amount of payments to each lobbying firm.(c)The total amount of all payments to lobbyists employed by the filer.(d)The information required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 86114. A person described in Section 86115 may, in a manner authorized by the commission, refer to and incorporate by reference the information contained in a report filed by the person’s lobbying firm pursuant to Section 86114 to meet the requirement of this subdivision.(e)A periodic report completed and verified by each lobbyist employed by a lobbyist employer pursuant to Section 86113.(f)Each activity expense of the filer. A total of all activity expenses of the filer shall be included.(g)The date, amount, and the name of the recipient of any contribution of one hundred dollars ($100) or more made by the filer to an elected state officer, a state candidate, or a committee controlled by an elected state officer or state candidate, or a committee primarily formed to support or oppose the officer or candidate. If this contribution is reported by the filer or by a committee sponsored by the filer in a campaign report filed pursuant to Chapter 4 which is required to be filed with the Secretary of State, the filer may report only the name of the committee, and the identification number of the committee.(h)(1)Except as set forth in paragraph (2), the total of all other payments to influence legislative or administrative action including overhead expenses and all payments to employees who spend more than 10 percent of their compensated time in any one month in activities related to influencing legislative or administrative action. Any payment to influence legislative or administrative action totaling two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more to a payee during a reporting period that was made in connection with an issue lobbying advertisement must include the identification number or, if none exists, the official title, popular name, or description of any legislative or administrative action clearly referred to in the issue lobbying advertisement as well as one of the following descriptions of the position of the filer who paid for the advertisement: “support,” “oppose,” “support if amended,” “oppose unless amended,” “neutral,” “neutral seeking amendment,” “neutral expressing concerns,” “no position,” or similar description.(2)A filer that makes payments to influence a ratemaking or quasi-legislative proceeding before the Public Utilities Commission, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c), respectively, of Section 82002, may, in lieu of reporting those payments pursuant to paragraph (1), report only the portion of those payments made to or for the filer’s attorneys for time spent appearing as counsel and preparing to appear as counsel, or to or for the filer’s witnesses for time spent testifying and preparing to testify, in this type of Public Utilities Commission proceeding. This alternative reporting of these payments made during a calendar month is not required to include payments made to an attorney or witness who is an employee of the filer if 10 percent or less of the attorney’s or witness’s compensated time in that month was spent appearing, testifying, or preparing to appear or testify before the Public Utilities Commission in a ratemaking or quasi-legislative proceeding. For the purposes of this paragraph, time spent preparing to appear or preparing to testify does not include time spent preparing written testimony.(i)Any other information required by the commission consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.